Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/eo_affix.dat
SFX I Y 105
SFX I   a     e           a
SFX I   a     ia          a
SFX I   a     iaj         a
SFX I   a     iajn        a
SFX I   a     ian         a
SFX I   a     ie          a
SFX I   a     io          a
SFX I   a     ioj         a
SFX I   a     iojn        a
SFX I   a     ion         a
SFX I   a     o           a
SFX I   a     oj          a
SFX I   a     ojn         a
SFX I   a     on          a
SFX I   0     j           a
SFX I   0     jn          a
SFX I   0     n           a
SFX I   e     a           e
SFX I   e     aj          e
SFX I   e     ajn         e
SFX I   e     an          e
SFX I   e     ia          e
SFX I   e     iaj         e
SFX I   e     iajn        e
SFX I   e     iaĵa        e
SFX I   e     iaĵaj       e
SFX I   e     iaĵajn      e
SFX I   e     iaĵan       e
SFX I   e     iaĵe        e
SFX I   e     iaĵo        e
SFX I   e     iaĵoj       e
SFX I   e     iaĵojn      e
SFX I   e     iaĵon       e
SFX I   e     ian         e
SFX I   e     ie          e
SFX I   e     io          e
SFX I   e     ioj         e
SFX I   e     iojn        e
SFX I   e     ion         e
SFX I   e     o           e
SFX I   e     oj          e
SFX I   e     ojn         e
SFX I   e     on          e
SFX I   i     a           i
SFX I   i     aj          i
SFX I   i     ajn         i
SFX I   i     an          i
SFX I   i     e           i
SFX I   i     e           i
SFX I   i     o           i
SFX I   i     oj          i
SFX I   i     ojn         i
SFX I   i     on          i
SFX I   0     aj          i
SFX I   0     ajn         i
SFX I   0     an          i
SFX I   0     o           i
SFX I   0     oj          i
SFX I   0     ojn         i
SFX I   0     on          i
SFX I   o     a           o
SFX I   o     aj          o
SFX I   o     ajn         o
SFX I   o     an          o
SFX I   o     e           o
SFX I   o     ia          [^i]o
SFX I   o     iaj         [^i]o
SFX I   o     iajn        [^i]o
SFX I   o     ian         [^i]o
SFX I   o     ie          [^i]o
SFX I   o     io          [^i]o
SFX I   o     ioj         [^i]o
SFX I   o     iojn        [^i]o
SFX I   o     ion         [^i]o
SFX I   0     j           o
SFX I   0     jn          o
SFX I   0     n           o
SFX I   io    uja         io
SFX I   io    ujaj        io
SFX I   io    ujajn       io
SFX I   io    ujan        io
SFX I   io    uje         io
SFX I   io    ujo         io
SFX I   io    ujoj        io
SFX I   io    ujojn       io
SFX I   io    ujon        io
SFX I   iano  ana         iano
SFX I   iano  anaj        iano
SFX I   iano  anajn       iano
SFX I   iano  anan        iano
SFX I   iano  ane         iano
SFX I   iano  ano         iano
SFX I   iano  anoj        iano
SFX I   iano  anojn       iano
SFX I   iano  anon        iano
SFX I   iano  anina       iano
SFX I   iano  aninaj      iano
SFX I   iano  aninajn     iano
SFX I   iano  aninan      iano
SFX I   iano  anine       iano
SFX I   iano  anine       iano
SFX I   iano  anino       iano
SFX I   iano  aninoj      iano
SFX I   iano  aninojn     iano
SFX I   iano  aninon      iano

SFX J Y 24
SFX J   a     eja         a
SFX J   a     ejaj        a
SFX J   a     ejajn       a
SFX J   a     ejan        a
SFX J   a     ejo         a
SFX J   a     ejoj        a
SFX J   a     ejojn       a
SFX J   a     ejon        a
SFX J   i     eja         i
SFX J   i     ejaj        i
SFX J   i     ejajn       i
SFX J   i     ejan        i
SFX J   i     ejo         i
SFX J   i     ejoj        i
SFX J   i     ejojn       i
SFX J   i     ejon        i
SFX J   o     eja         o
SFX J   o     ejaj        o
SFX J   o     ejajn       o
SFX J   o     ejan        o
SFX J   o     ejo         o
SFX J   o     ejoj        o
SFX J   o     ejojn       o
SFX J   o     ejon        o

SFX K Y 24
SFX K   0     ra          a
SFX K   0     raj         a
SFX K   0     rajn        a
SFX K   0     ran         a
SFX K   0     ro          a
SFX K   0     roj         a
SFX K   0     rojn        a
SFX K   0     ron         a
SFX K   i     ara         i
SFX K   i     araj        i
SFX K   i     arajn       i
SFX K   i     aran        i
SFX K   i     aro         i
SFX K   i     aroj        i
SFX K   i     arojn       i
SFX K   i     aron        i
SFX K   o     ara         o
SFX K   o     araj        o
SFX K   o     arajn       o
SFX K   o     aran        o
SFX K   o     aro         o
SFX K   o     aroj        o
SFX K   o     arojn       o
SFX K   o     aron        o

SFX L Y 24
SFX L   a     igila       a
SFX L   a     igilaj      a
SFX L   a     igilajn     a
SFX L   a     igilan      a
SFX L   a     igilo       a
SFX L   a     igiloj      a
SFX L   a     igilojn     a
SFX L   a     igilon      a
SFX L   0     la          i
SFX L   0     laj         i
SFX L   0     lajn        i
SFX L   0     lan         i
SFX L   0     lo          i
SFX L   0     loj         i
SFX L   0     lojn        i
SFX L   0     lon         i
SFX L   o     ila         o
SFX L   o     ilaj        o
SFX L   o     ilajn       o
SFX L   o     ilan        o
SFX L   o     ilo         o
SFX L   o     iloj        o
SFX L   o     ilojn       o
SFX L   o     ilon        o

SFX O Y 17
SFX O   a     '           a
SFX O   a     o           a
SFX O   a     oj          a
SFX O   a     ojn         a
SFX O   a     on          a
SFX O   0     j           a
SFX O   0     jn          a
SFX O   0     n           a
SFX O   i     '           i
SFX O   i     o           i
SFX O   i     oj          i
SFX O   i     ojn         i
SFX O   i     on          i
SFX O   o     '           o
SFX O   0     j           o
SFX O   0     jn          o
SFX O   0     n           o

SFX P Y 16
SFX P   a     oj          a
SFX P   a     ojn         a
SFX P   0     n           [aeijou]
SFX P   aj    e           aj
SFX P   0     j           [au]
SFX P   0     jn          [au]
SFX P   0     e           [^ajeou]
SFX P   0     a           [^ajou]
SFX P   0     aj          [^ajou]
SFX P   0     ajn         [^ajou]
SFX P   0     an          [^ajou]
SFX P   0     a           [^ijaou]
SFX P   0     o           [^ijaou]
SFX P   0     oj          [^ijaou]
SFX P   0     ojn         [^ijaou]
SFX P   0     on          [^ijaou]

SFX Q Y 132
SFX Q   0     ĝis         i
SFX Q   0     ĝas         i
SFX Q   0     ĝos         i
SFX Q   0     ĝu          i
SFX Q   0     ĝus         i
SFX Q   0     ĝinta       i
SFX Q   0     ĝintaj      i
SFX Q   0     ĝintajn     i
SFX Q   0     ĝintan      i
SFX Q   0     ĝinte       i
SFX Q   0     ĝinto       i
SFX Q   0     ĝintoj      i
SFX Q   0     ĝintojn     i
SFX Q   0     ĝinton      i
SFX Q   0     ĝanta       i
SFX Q   0     ĝantaj      i
SFX Q   0     ĝantajn     i
SFX Q   0     ĝantan      i
SFX Q   0     ĝante       i
SFX Q   0     ĝanto       i
SFX Q   0     ĝantoj      i
SFX Q   0     ĝantojn     i
SFX Q   0     ĝanton      i
SFX Q   0     ĝonta       i
SFX Q   0     ĝontaj      i
SFX Q   0     ĝontajn     i
SFX Q   0     ĝontan      i
SFX Q   0     ĝonte       i
SFX Q   0     ĝonto       i
SFX Q   0     ĝontoj      i
SFX Q   0     ĝontojn     i
SFX Q   0     ĝonton      i
SFX Q   0     ĝo          i
SFX Q   0     ĝoj         i
SFX Q   0     ĝojn        i
SFX Q   0     ĝon         i
SFX Q   0     ĝi          i
SFX Q   0     ĝa          i
SFX Q   0     ĝaj         i
SFX Q   0     ĝajn        i
SFX Q   0     ĝan         i
SFX Q   0     ĝe          i
SFX Q   0     ĝema        i
SFX Q   0     ĝemaj       i
SFX Q   0     ĝemajn      i
SFX Q   0     ĝeman       i
SFX Q   0     ĝeme        i
SFX Q   0     ĝemo        i
SFX Q   0     ĝemoj       i
SFX Q   0     ĝemojn      i
SFX Q   0     ĝemon       i
SFX Q   a     iĝis        a
SFX Q   a     iĝas        a
SFX Q   a     iĝos        a
SFX Q   a     iĝu         a
SFX Q   a     iĝus        a
SFX Q   a     iĝinta      a
SFX Q   a     iĝintaj     a
SFX Q   a     iĝintajn    a
SFX Q   a     iĝintan     a
SFX Q   a     iĝinte      a
SFX Q   a     iĝinto      a
SFX Q   a     iĝintoj     a
SFX Q   a     iĝintojn    a
SFX Q   a     iĝinton     a
SFX Q   a     iĝanta      a
SFX Q   a     iĝantaj     a
SFX Q   a     iĝantajn    a
SFX Q   a     iĝantan     a
SFX Q   a     iĝante      a
SFX Q   a     iĝanto      a
SFX Q   a     iĝantoj     a
SFX Q   a     iĝantojn    a
SFX Q   a     iĝanton     a
SFX Q   a     iĝonta      a
SFX Q   a     iĝontaj     a
SFX Q   a     iĝontajn    a
SFX Q   a     iĝontan     a
SFX Q   a     iĝonte      a
SFX Q   a     iĝonto      a
SFX Q   a     iĝontoj     a
SFX Q   a     iĝontojn    a
SFX Q   a     iĝonton     a
SFX Q   a     iĝo         a
SFX Q   a     iĝoj        a
SFX Q   a     iĝojn       a
SFX Q   a     iĝon        a
SFX Q   a     iĝi         a
SFX Q   a     iĝa         a
SFX Q   a     iĝaj        a
SFX Q   a     iĝajn       a
SFX Q   a     iĝan        a
SFX Q   a     iĝe         a
SFX Q   a     iĝema       a
SFX Q   a     iĝemaj      a
SFX Q   a     iĝemajn     a
SFX Q   a     iĝeman      a
SFX Q   a     iĝeme       a
SFX Q   a     iĝemo       a
SFX Q   a     iĝemoj      a
SFX Q   a     iĝemojn     a
SFX Q   a     iĝemon      a
SFX Q   a     iĝado       a
SFX Q   a     iĝadoj      a
SFX Q   a     iĝadojn     a
SFX Q   a     iĝadon      a
SFX Q   a     iĝadis      a
SFX Q   a     iĝadas      a
SFX Q   a     iĝados      a
SFX Q   a     iĝadu       a
SFX Q   a     iĝadus      a
SFX Q   a     iĝada       a
SFX Q   a     iĝadaj      a
SFX Q   a     iĝadajn     a
SFX Q   a     iĝadan      a
SFX Q   a     iĝade       a
SFX Q   a     iĝadi       a
SFX Q   0     ĝado        i
SFX Q   0     ĝadoj       i
SFX Q   0     ĝadojn      i
SFX Q   0     ĝadon       i
SFX Q   0     ĝadis       i
SFX Q   0     ĝadas       i
SFX Q   0     ĝados       i
SFX Q   0     ĝadu        i
SFX Q   0     ĝadus       i
SFX Q   0     ĝada        i
SFX Q   0     ĝadaj       i
SFX Q   0     ĝadajn      i
SFX Q   0     ĝadan       i
SFX Q   0     ĝade        i
SFX Q   0     ĝadi        i

SFX S Y 73
SFX S   o     ista        o
SFX S   o     istaj       o
SFX S   o     istajn      o
SFX S   o     istan       o
SFX S   o     istina      o
SFX S   o     istinaj     o
SFX S   o     istinajn    o
SFX S   o     istinan     o
SFX S   o     iste        o
SFX S   o     istine      o
SFX S   o     isto        o
SFX S   o     istoj       o
SFX S   o     istojn      o
SFX S   o     iston       o
SFX S   o     istino      o
SFX S   o     istinoj     o
SFX S   o     istinojn    o
SFX S   o     istinon     o
SFX S   a     ista        a
SFX S   a     istaj       a
SFX S   a     istajn      a
SFX S   a     istan       a
SFX S   a     istina      a
SFX S   a     istinaj     a
SFX S   a     istinajn    a
SFX S   a     istinan     a
SFX S   a     iste        a
SFX S   a     istine      a
SFX S   a     isto        a
SFX S   a     istoj       a
SFX S   a     istojn      a
SFX S   a     iston       a
SFX S   a     istino      a
SFX S   a     istinoj     a
SFX S   a     istinojn    a
SFX S   a     istinon     a
SFX S   0     sta         i
SFX S   0     staj        i
SFX S   0     stajn       i
SFX S   0     stan        i
SFX S   0     stina       i
SFX S   0     stinaj      i
SFX S   0     stinajn     i
SFX S   0     stinan      i
SFX S   0     ste         i
SFX S   0     stine       i
SFX S   0     sto         i
SFX S   0     stoj        i
SFX S   0     stojn       i
SFX S   0     ston        i
SFX S   0     stino       i
SFX S   0     stinoj      i
SFX S   0     stinojn     i
SFX S   0     stinon      i
SFX S   mo    ta          ismo
SFX S   mo    taj         ismo
SFX S   mo    tajn        ismo
SFX S   mo    tan         ismo
SFX S   mo    tina        ismo
SFX S   mo    tinaj       ismo
SFX S   mo    tinajn      ismo
SFX S   mo    tinan       ismo
SFX S   mo    te          ismo
SFX S   mo    tine        ismo
SFX S   mo    t'          ismo
SFX S   mo    to          ismo
SFX S   mo    toj         ismo
SFX S   mo    tojn        ismo
SFX S   mo    ton         ismo
SFX S   mo    tino        ismo
SFX S   mo    tinoj       ismo
SFX S   mo    tinojn      ismo
SFX S   mo    tinon       ismo
